apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="درێژ__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێک</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەکە</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەکان</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یەکەم__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دووھەم__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>




    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="ئەمرۆ__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

 



<!-- 
    <pardef n="verb">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pron-clit">
      <e><p><l>im</l><r>m<s n="p1"/><j/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="p3"/><j/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

   <e lm="bang daka"><p><l>bang</l><r></r></p><par n="pron-clit"/><p><l><b/>daka</l><r>bang<b/>daka</r></p><par n="verb"/></e>
    <e lm="یەکەم"><i>یەکەم</i><par n="یەکەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دووھەم"><i>دووھەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سێھەم"><i>سێھەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="چوارەم"><i>چوارەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پێنجەم"><i>پێنجەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="شەشەم"><i>شەشەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="حەوتەم"><i>حەوتەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ھەشتەم"><i>ھەشتەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="نۆھەم"><i>نۆھەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="دەھەم"><i>دەھەم</i><par n="دووھەم__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاسان"><i>ئاسان</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاڵ"><i>ئاڵ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاوساو"><i>ئاوساو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەستوور"><i>ئەستوور</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بازاڕی"><i>بازاڕی</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="برژاو"><i>برژاو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بڵاو"><i>بڵاو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بەتاڵ"><i>بەتاڵ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بەخزمەت"><i>بەخزمەت</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بەرز"><i>بەرز</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بەکار"><i>بەکار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بێخود"><i>بێخود</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="بێسوود"><i>بێسوود</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="پر"><i>پر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="پەشیمان"><i>پەشیمان</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="پێویست"><i>پێویست</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="تاریک"><i>تاریک</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="تاوانبار"><i>تاوانبار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ترسنۆک"><i>ترسنۆک</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="تەمەڵ"><i>تەمەڵ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="تێر"><i>تێر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="جاڕس"><i>جاڕس</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="چاک"><i>چاک</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="چۆڵ"><i>چۆڵ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="حازر"><i>حازر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="خاکی"><i>خاکی</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="خۆڕایی"><i>خۆڕایی</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="خوێندەوار"><i>خوێندەوار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="خەمبار"><i>خەمبار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="درەنگ"><i>درەنگ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="دڵدار"><i>دڵدار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="دڵگیر"><i>دڵگیر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="دوور"><i>دوور</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="دەسڵاتدار"><i>دەسڵاتدار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕابوردوو"><i>ڕابوردوو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕۆشن"><i>ڕۆشن</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕەنگاوڕەنگ"><i>ڕەنگاوڕەنگ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="زەبەللاح"><i>زەبەللاح</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ساختەچی"><i>ساختەچی</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="سەربەخۆ"><i>سەربەخۆ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="شل"><i>شل</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="عاقڵ"><i>عاقڵ</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="قەرزار"><i>قەرزار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="کز"><i>کز</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="کەم"><i>کەم</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="لاواز"><i>لاواز</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="مەرد"><i>مەرد</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ناپسەند"><i>ناپسەند</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="نایاب"><i>نایاب</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="نەگبەت"><i>نەگبەت</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="وشیار"><i>وشیار</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="هێمن"><i>هێمن</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ژێر"><i>ژێر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="وەکو"><i>وەکو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆمەڵایەتی"><i>کۆمەڵایەتی</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="دەربڕاو"><i>دەربڕاو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="پێویست"><i>پێویست</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕاوەستاو"><i>ڕاوەستاو</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="پێویست"><i>پێویست</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
     <e lm="سارد"><i>سارد</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
     <e lm="هەستەوەر"><i>هەستەوەر</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
     <e lm="سڕ "><i>سڕ </i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
     <e lm="کول"><i>کول</i><par n="درێژ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="سبەی"><i>سبەی</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هەرگیز"><i>هەرگیز</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="تەنها"><i>تەنها</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەمرۆ"><i>ئەمرۆ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەمشەو"><i>ئەمشەو</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ئەوێ"><i>ئەوێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لەوێ"><i>لەوێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="لەوێوە"><i>لەوێوە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="پێک"><i>پێک</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="دوای"><i>دوای</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="زۆر"><i>زۆر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="هیچ"><i>هیچ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاخر"><i>ئاخر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاخری"><i>ئاخری</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەگینا"><i>ئەگینا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمجا"><i>ئەمجا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەوا"><i>ئەوا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەوسا"><i>ئەوسا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەوێ"><i>ئەوێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئێجگار"><i>ئێجگار</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئێرە"><i>ئێرە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئێستا"><i>ئێستا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئێوارە"><i>ئێوارە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیمڕۆ"><i>ئیمڕۆ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیمشەو"><i>ئیمشەو</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="بابەتانە"><i>بابەتانە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="بەردەم"><i>بەردەم</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="بەردەوامی"><i>بەردەوامی</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="پاش"><i>پاش</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="پاشان"><i>پاشان</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="تەنانەت"><i>تەنانەت</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="تەنیشت"><i>تەنیشت</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="جا"><i>جا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="جاران"><i>جاران</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="جێبەجێ"><i>جێبەجێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="چاک"><i>چاک</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="چی"><i>چی</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="حەفتانە"><i>حەفتانە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="خاوەخاو"><i>خاوەخاو</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="خێرا"><i>خێرا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دایمە"><i>دایمە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دوا"><i>دوا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دووبارە"><i>دووبارە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دوور"><i>دوور</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دووسبەی"><i>دووسبەی</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="دەستبەجێ"><i>دەستبەجێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕاستەخۆ"><i>ڕاستەخۆ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="زانستانە"><i>زانستانە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="زۆر"><i>زۆر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="زوو"><i>زوو</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="زیاتر"><i>زیاتر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="سبەینێ"><i>سبەینێ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="قەت"><i>قەت</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="کەم"><i>کەم</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="لەپڕ"><i>لەپڕ</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="لێرە"><i>لێرە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="نەک"><i>نەک</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="وەک"><i>وەک</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="هەر"><i>هەر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="هەرچەندە"><i>هەرچەندە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="هەرە"><i>هەرە</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="هێشتا"><i>هێشتا</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
      <e lm="یەکسەر"><i>یەکسەر</i><par n="ئەمرۆ__adv"/></e>
